Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.14
Distributor representative, defined.

Distributor representative
means a representative employed by a distributor or distributor branch for
the same purpose as set forth in the definition of factory representative.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 26.